Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB723.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 139 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
On or before October 1, 2026, and every October 1 thereafter, eighty percent (80%) of
the tax receipts, interest, and penalties of sales and use taxes collected during the
immediately preceding fiscal year from establishments classified under the 2022 North
American Industry Classification System Code 459110 shall be transferred to the
Kentucky Heritage Land Conservation fund established in KRS 146.570.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/19/2026 4:17 PM Jacketed